Utah statutes.
59-7-117.   Equitable adjustments.

The commission shall by rule prescribe for adjustments to Utah taxable income when, solely by reason of the enactment of this chapter, a taxpayer would otherwise receive or have received a double tax benefit or suffer or have suffered a double tax detriment.  However, the commission may not make any adjustment pursuant to this section which will result in an increase or decrease of tax liability that is less than $25.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 169, 1993 General Session

